Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-811
Exemption from occupation tax.

Lottery games conducted pursuant to the State Lottery Act shall be exempt from any local or occupation tax levied or assessed by any political subdivision having the power to levy, assess, or collect such a tax.

Laws 1991, LB 849, § 11;

Laws 1993, LB 138, § 27.